test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-baegga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bägga: # N_EVEN_NOCG (no grade alternations)
    bägga+N+Sg+Nom: bägga
    bägga+N+Sg+Gen: biegga
    bägga+N+Sg+Acc: bieggav
    bägga+N+Sg+Ill: bäggaj
    bägga+N+Sg+Ine: bieggan
    bägga+N+Sg+Ela: [bieggast, bieggas]
    bägga+N+Sg+Com: [bieggajn, bieggajna]
    bägga+N+Pl+Nom: biegga
    bägga+N+Pl+Gen: bieggaj
    bägga+N+Pl+Acc: bieggajd
    bägga+N+Pl+Ill: bieggajda
    bägga+N+Pl+Ine: bieggajn
    bägga+N+Pl+Ela: [bieggajst, bieggajs]
    bägga+N+Pl+Com: [bieggaj, bieggajgum]
    bägga+N+Ess: bäggan
    bägga+N+Abe: bieggadak
